Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.071

Survivorship as incident of tenancy by the entireties abolished.

The right of survivorship as an incident of tenancy by the entireties is abolished.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.04.071.]

NOTES:

Joint tenancy: Chapter 64.28 RCW.

Safe deposit repository—Lease provision ineffective to create joint tenancy or transfer at one lessee's death: RCW 11.02.130.